lexc/noun/enhufnevek.lexc
!!!enhu2.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem +Pref+
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sue +Sup +Ter
      
§EOA§ §uue§ §OEOE1§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oeoez1§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §ooez3§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§ §oeoez5§ §Jnull§ §JPnull§
§VV§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ §JJ§ §JPJ§ §VVH§ §VVdzs§

§ooez18§ §uue2§ §EOA17§ §oooe2§ §oeoez22§
§AAA2§ §oeoe2§ §AA2§ §oeoez25§

      
LEXICON Root
Noun;
Prefnum;
Prefigekoto;

LEXICON Prefnum
+Pref+:sok       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:több       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:fél       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:másod       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:harmad       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:negyed       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ötöd       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hatod       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:heted       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolcad       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilenced       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tized       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:huszad       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:harmincad       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:negyvened       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ötvened       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hetvened       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:század       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ezred       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:egy       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:két       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:három       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:négy       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:öt       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hat       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hét       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolc       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilenc       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tíz       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenegy       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenkét       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenhárom       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizennégy       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenöt       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenhat       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenhét       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizennyolc       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenkilenc       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:húsz       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:harminc       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:negyven       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ötven       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hatvan       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hetven       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolcvan       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilencven       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:száz       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ezer       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:millió       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:milliárd       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
                        Noun2; ! empty string entry

LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Noun3;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Noun3;
+Pref+:széjjel   Noun3;
+Pref+:szembe   Noun3;
+Pref+:szerte   Noun3;
+Pref+:vissza   Noun3;
+Pref+:helyre   Noun3;
+Pref+:tovább   Noun3;
+Pref+:tönkre   Noun3;
+Pref+:észre   Noun3;
+Pref+:rajta   Noun3;
+Pref+:előre   Noun3;
+Pref+:félbe   Noun3;
+Pref+:félre   Noun3;
+Pref+:felül   Noun3;
+Pref+:fölül   Noun3;
+Pref+:agyon   Noun3;
+Pref+:ellen   Noun3;
+Pref+:körbe   Noun3;
+Pref+:körül   Noun3;
+Pref+:közbe   Noun3;
+Pref+:közre   Noun3;
+Pref+:külön   Noun3;
+Pref+:utána   Noun3;
+Pref+:végbe   Noun3;
+Pref+:végig   Noun3;
+Pref+:hátra   Noun3;
+Pref+:hozzá   Noun3;
+Pref+:egybe   Noun3;
+Pref+:ketté   Noun3;
+Pref+:össze   Noun3;
+Pref+:mellé   Noun3;
+Pref+:által   Noun3;
+Pref+:alul   Noun3;
+Pref+:haza   Noun3;
+Pref+:újra   Noun3;
+Pref+:abba   Noun3;
+Pref+:neki   Noun3;
+Pref+:bele   Noun3;
+Pref+:újjá   Noun3;
+Pref+:benn   Noun3;
+Pref+:fenn   Noun3;
+Pref+:fönn   Noun3;
+Pref+:jóvá   Noun3;
+Pref+:szét   Noun3;
+Pref+:tele   Noun3;
+Pref+:tova   Noun3;
+Pref+:meg   Noun3;
+Pref+:oda   Noun3;
+Pref+:elő   Noun3;
+Pref+:túl   Noun3;
+Pref+:alá   Noun3;
+Pref+:föl   Noun3;
+Pref+:ide   Noun3;
+Pref+:fel   Noun3;
+Pref+:rá   Noun3;
+Pref+:ki   Noun3;
+Pref+:le   Noun3;
+Pref+:el   Noun3;
+Pref+:át   Noun3;
+Pref+:be   Noun3;
            Noun3;

LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
                            Gen;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

!fiú, fi
LEXICON AddNoun1
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss1;  !fiam
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur1; ! fiak
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam1;   !fiék

LEXICON Poss1
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez18§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA17§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^am   Fam1;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^ad   Fam1;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^a   Fam1;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^unk   Fam1;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^atok   Fam1;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^uk   Fam1;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^aim   Fam1;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^aid   Fam1;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^ai   Fam1;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^aink   Fam1;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^aitok   Fam1;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^aik   Fam1;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
!                                    Gen1;

LEXICON Plur1
+Plur:^+cPlur^ak    Gen1;
                            Gen1;

LEXICON Fam1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen1;
                       Gen1;

LEXICON Gen1
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case1;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case1;
                       Case1;
 

LEXICON Noun2
zónás AddNoun;
LEXICON Noun3
kocsihajtó AddNoun;
értékeltség AddNoun;
LEXICON Noun
alakzókeret AddNoun;
antifóna AddNoun;
asztalfiú:asztalfi AddNoun1;
atyjafiú:atyjafi AddNoun1;
atyánkfiú:atyánkfi AddNoun1;
autointoxikáció AddNoun;
bankárfiú:bankárfi AddNoun1;
benzil AddNoun;
bevándorlófiú:bevándorlófi AddNoun1;
bohócfiú:bohócfi AddNoun1;
borissza AddNoun;
bronzkisfiú:bronzkisfi AddNoun1;
bányászfiú:bányászfi AddNoun1;
béresfiú:béresfi AddNoun1;
bérverő AddNoun;
búcsúfiú:búcsúfi AddNoun1;
cicafiú:cicafi AddNoun1;
cisztalgia AddNoun;
csapatfiú:csapatfi AddNoun1;
cserkészfiú:cserkészfi AddNoun1;
csodafiú:csodafi AddNoun1;
csomó AddNoun;
cukrászfiú:cukrászfi AddNoun1;
dekoráció AddNoun;
dohányzó AddNoun;
dzsentrifiú:dzsentrifi AddNoun1;
egyenruha AddNoun;
eladófiú:eladófi AddNoun1;
előverseny AddNoun;
emberkisfiú:emberkisfi AddNoun1;
evilágiság AddNoun;
farkasfiú:farkasfi AddNoun1;
fejgerenda AddNoun;
felkelőfiú:felkelőfi AddNoun1;
flepnis AddNoun;
fodrászfiú:fodrászfi AddNoun1;
funkció AddNoun;
fémfiú:fémfi AddNoun1;
földművesfiú:földművesfi AddNoun1;
főbejárat AddNoun;
fűszeresfiú:fűszeresfi AddNoun1;
gepárdfiú:gepárdfi AddNoun1;
girondizmus AddNoun;
gorillafiú:gorillafi AddNoun1;
gyermekfiú:gyermekfi AddNoun1;
gyorsúszó AddNoun;
gépészfiú:gépészfi AddNoun1;
hadova AddNoun;
hallgatófiú:hallgatófi AddNoun1;
hatálybaléptetés AddNoun;
hentesfiú:hentesfi AddNoun1;
hisztidin AddNoun;
holdfiú:holdfi AddNoun1;
hordárfiú:hordárfi AddNoun1;
hátúszás AddNoun;
igazgatófiú:igazgatófi AddNoun1;
illuminátor AddNoun;
iparosfiú:iparosfi AddNoun1;
iskolaelső AddNoun;
istállófiú:istállófi AddNoun1;
jobbágyfiú:jobbágyfi AddNoun1;
jófiú:jófi AddNoun1;
jóhangzás AddNoun;
kantinosfiú:kantinosfi AddNoun1;
karének AddNoun;
kereskedőfiú:kereskedőfi AddNoun1;
kiberkalóz AddNoun;
kifutófiú:kifutófi AddNoun1;
kisegítőfiú:kisegítőfi AddNoun1;
koboldfiú:koboldfi AddNoun1;
kobra AddNoun;
konyhafiú:konyhafi AddNoun1;
koordináta AddNoun;
kurvahajcsár AddNoun;
kutyafiú:kutyafi AddNoun1;
kéjfiú:kéjfi AddNoun1;
kínálgatás AddNoun;
könyvtárosfiú:könyvtárosfi AddNoun1;
különbözet AddNoun;
lelencfiú:lelencfi AddNoun1;
lexikon AddNoun;
lombikfiú:lombikfi AddNoun1;
látszatszépfiú:látszatszépfi AddNoun1;
lépték AddNoun;
mangán AddNoun;
matrózfiú:matrózfi AddNoun1;
metodika AddNoun;
ministránsfiú:ministránsfi AddNoun1;
modellfiú:modellfi AddNoun1;
mosószett AddNoun;
munkásfiú:munkásfi AddNoun1;
médiaférfiú:médiaférfi AddNoun1;
mérték AddNoun;
napfiú:napfi AddNoun1;
nehezék AddNoun;
nyomvatartás AddNoun;
nyuszifiú:nyuszifi AddNoun1;
oppozíció AddNoun;
országférfiú:országférfi AddNoun1;
parancsütemező AddNoun;
parasztfiú:parasztfi AddNoun1;
pikolófiú:pikolófi AddNoun1;
pikoszekundum AddNoun;
polgárfiú:polgárfi AddNoun1;
porond AddNoun;
portásfiú:portásfi AddNoun1;
prolifiú:prolifi AddNoun1;
pulpitus AddNoun;
pénzfiú:pénzfi AddNoun1;
pónifiú:pónifi AddNoun1;
púderszelence AddNoun;
rakodófiú:rakodófi AddNoun1;
rendőrfiú:rendőrfi AddNoun1;
repülőfedélzet AddNoun;
rokonfiú:rokonfi AddNoun1;
rénium AddNoun;
rókafiú:rókafi AddNoun1;
senkifiú:senkifi AddNoun1;
sintér AddNoun;
skorpiófiú:skorpiófi AddNoun1;
suhancfiú:suhancfi AddNoun1;
svédasztal AddNoun;
szalonférfiú:szalonférfi AddNoun1;
szedőfiú:szedőfi AddNoun1;
személyzet AddNoun;
szerencsefiú:szerencsefi AddNoun1;
szlovákság AddNoun;
szárnycsapkodás AddNoun;
szűköcske AddNoun;
tacskófiú:tacskófi AddNoun1;
tarkaharkály AddNoun;
tejesfiú:tejesfi AddNoun1;
terítő AddNoun;
transzliteráció AddNoun;
turistafiú:turistafi AddNoun1;
téma AddNoun;
univeralizmus AddNoun;
vadbikafiú:vadbikafi AddNoun1;
vendég AddNoun;
viszontkereset AddNoun;
vándorfiú:vándorfi AddNoun1;
vízduzzasztó AddNoun;
zulufiú:zulufi AddNoun1;
zárfékező AddNoun;
ármódosulás AddNoun;
énekesfiú:énekesfi AddNoun1;
íjászat AddNoun;
özvegység AddNoun;
úszófiú:úszófi AddNoun1;
Anikó AddNoun;
Megyerke AddNoun;
Balatonfüred AddNoun;
Csáford AddNoun;
Gerde AddNoun;
Kerecsend AddNoun;
Magyarbece AddNoun;
Nemesvid AddNoun;
Szapáryfalva AddNoun;
Torontálvásárhely AddNoun;
Szumátra AddNoun;
Lechner AddNoun;
